fr: Type de platine de prototypage: Pleine taille; Demi-taille; Long; Mini; Plaque perforée; Alimenté; Plaque de prototypage; Soudable; Sans soudure; Empilable; Plaque à bandes; Transparent; Autre
nl: Breadboard type: Volledige grootte; Halve grootte; Lang; Mini; Perfboard; Met voeding; Proto board; Soldeerbaar; Soldeerloos; Stapelbaar; Stripboard; Transparant; Andere
pt-PT: Tipo de placa de ensaio: Tamanho completo; Meio tamanho; Comprido; Mini; Placa perfurada; Com amplificadores; Placa de protótipo; Soldável; Sem solda; Empilhável; Placa de tiras; Transparente; Outro
tr: Breadboard tipi: Tam boyutlu; Yarım boy; Uzun; Mini; Delikli plaka; Güçlendirilmiş; Prototip kartı; Lehimlenebilir; Lehimsiz; İstiflenebilir; Şerit plaka; Şeffaf; Diğer
da: Breadboard-type: Fuld størrelse; Halv størrelse; Lang; Mini; Perfboard; Strømdrevet; Prototypeplade; Lodbar; Loddefri; Stabelbar; Stripboard; Transparent; Andet
de: Steckbrett‑Typ: Volle Größe; Halbgröße; Lang; Mini; Lochrasterplatine; Mit Power; Prototypenplatine; Lötbar; Lötfrei; Stapelbar; Streifenrasterplatine; Transparent; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Tipo de protoboard: Tamanho real; Meio tamanho; Longo; Mini; Placa perfurada; Com plataforma; Protoboard; Soldável; Sem solda; Empilhável; Placa de trilhas; Transparente; Outro
ru: Тип макетной платы: Полноразмерный; Половинного размера; Длинный; Мини; Перфорированная плата; Электропривод; Макетная плата; Паяемая; Беспаечная; Составной; Полосовая плата; Прозрачная; Другой
hu: Breadboard-típus: Teljes méret; Fél méretű; Hosszú; Mini; Próbapanel; Elektromos; Prototípus panel; Forrasztható; Forrasztásmentes; Egymásra rakható; Csíkraszteres panel; Átlátszó; Egyéb
sv: Typ av kopplingsplatta: Full storlek; Halvstorlek; Lång; Mini; Experimentkort; Drivs; Prototypkort; Lödbar; Lödfri; Stapelbar; Stripboard; Transparent; Övrigt
fi: Koekytkentälevyn tyyppi: Täysikokoinen; Puolikokoinen; Pitkä; Mini; Reikälevy; Virtalähde; Prototyyppilevy; Juotettava; Juotokseton; Pinottava; Liuskalevy; Läpinäkyvä; Muu
el: Τύπος breadboard: Πλήρους μεγέθους; Μισού μεγέθους; Μακρύ; Μίνι; Διάτρητη πλακέτα; Τροφοδοτούμενος; Πρωτότυπη πλακέτα; Συγκολλήσιμο; Χωρίς συγκόλληση; Στοιβαζόμενος; Πλακέτα με λωρίδες; Διαφανές; Άλλο
es: Tipo de protoboard: Tamaño completo; Medio tamaño; Largo; Mini; Placa perforada; Alimentado; Placa de prototipado; Soldable; Sin soldadura; Apilable; Placa de tiras; Transparente; Otros
pl: Typ płytki stykowej: Pełnowymiarowy; Półwymiarowa; Długie; Min.; Płytka uniwersalna; Zasilany; Płytka prototypowa; Do lutowania; Bezlutowa; Nakładające się; Płytka paskowa; Przezroczysta; Inne
en: Breadboard type: Full-size; Half-size; Long; Mini; Perfboard; Powered; Proto board; Solderable; Solderless; Stackable; Stripboard; Transparent; Other
vi: Loại breadboard: Cỡ chuẩn; Kích thước một nửa; Dài; Siêu ngắn; Bảng đục lỗ; Có khuếch đại công suất; Bảng nguyên mẫu; Có thể hàn; Không cần hàn; Có thể xếp chồng; Bảng dải; Trong suốt; Khác
zh-TW: 麵包板類型: 全尺寸; 半尺寸; 長; 迷你裙; 洞洞板; 主動; 原型板; 可焊接; 無焊; 可堆疊; 條形板; 透明; 其他
bg-BG: Тип макетна платка: Пълноразмерен; Половин размер; Дълга; Мини; Перфорирана платка; Със захранване; Прототипна платка; За запояване; Без запояване; За подреждане; Лентова платка; Прозрачен; Други
nb: Koblingsbrett type: Full størrelse; Halvstørrelse; Lang; Mini; Perforeringsbrett; Elektrisk; Prototypebrett; Loddbar; Loddefri; Kan stables; Stripebrett; Gjennomsiktig; Annet
ro-RO: Tip placă test: Dimensiune completă; Jumătate de dimensiune; Lungă; Mini; Placă perforată; Alimentată; Placă de prototipare; Pentru lipire; Fără lipire; Cu posibilitate de stivuire; Placă cu benzi; Transparentă; Altele
sk-SK: Typ breadboardu: Plná veľkosť; Polovičná veľkosť; Dlhý; Mini; Univerzálna doska; Napájaný; Prototypová doska; Spájkovateľný; Bezspájkový; Stohovateľný; Pásiková doska; Transparentný; Iné
it: Tipo di breadboard: Dimensione piena; Mezza dimensione; Lungo; Mini; Basetta millefori; Alimentato; Scheda prototipo; Saldabile; Senza saldatura; Impilabile; Stripboard; Trasparente; Altro
sl-SI: Tip prototipne plošče: Polna velikost; Polovične velikosti; Dolga; Mini; Perforirana plošča; Električen; Prototipna plošča; Za spajkanje; Brez spajkanja; Zložljiv; Trakasta plošča; Prozorna; Drugo
lt-LT: Breadboard tipas: Įprasto dydžio; Pusės dydžio; Ilga; Mini; Perforuota plokštė; Elektrinis; Prototipo plokštė; Lituojama; Belituojamė; Komplektuojami; Juostinė plokštė; Permatoma; Kita
th: ประเภทเบรดบอร์ด: ขนาดเต็ม; ขนาดครึ่ง; ยาว; มินิ; แผ่นปริ้นต์; มีแอมป์ขยายเสียง; แผ่นโปรโต; แบบบัดกรีได้; แบบไม่ต้องบัดกรี; วางซ้อนกันได้; แผ่นสตริป; แบบใส; อื่นๆ
cs: Typ nepájivého pole: Plná velikost; Poloviční velikost; Dlouhé; Mini; Univerzální deska; Napájeno; Prototypová deska; Pájitelná; Nepájivá; Stohovatelné; Páskovaná deska; Průhledná; Jiné
hr-HR: Vrsta eksperimentalne ploče: Puna veličina; Pola veličine; Duga; Mini; Perfbord; Na struju; Proto ploča; Za lemljenje; Bez lemljenja; Može se slagati; Stripbord; Prozirni; Ostalo
ko: 브레드보드 유형: 풀사이즈; 하프사이즈; 롱; 미니; 만능기판; 전원; 프로토 보드; 납땜 가능; 무납땜; 쌓을 수 있음; 스트립보드; 투명; 기타
ja: ブレッドボードタイプ: フルサイズ; ハーフサイズ; ロング; ミニ; パーフボード; 電源付き; プロトボード; はんだ付け可能; はんだ不要; 積み重ね可能; ストリップボード; 透明; その他
zh-CN: 面包板类型: 全尺寸; 半尺寸; 长; 迷你; 洞洞板; 电源型; 原型板; 可焊接; 免焊; 可叠放; 条形板; 透明; 其他